District of Columbia statutes.
46-228

Choice of law.

(a)

The law and procedures of the jurisdiction in which the obligor is employed shall apply, except with respect to:

(1)

When withholding must be implemented; and

(2)

The statute of limitations for maintaining an action on arrearages of support payments.

(b)

The Court shall apply the statute of limitations for maintaining an action on arrearages of support payments of either this jurisdiction or the jurisdiction that issued the support order, whichever is longer.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 29, 33 DCR 6710

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-528.